Hawaii statutes.
§157-22 Application for license and payment
of fee. An applicant for an original or renewal license to operate as a
producer, producer-distributor, or distributor shall file an application upon a
form prepared by the board of agriculture, containing such information which
the board deems necessary for the administration of this chapter. The board
shall establish a reasonable application fee for an original or renewal license
which the applicant shall remit when application is filed. An agricultural cooperative
all of whose producer-members have complied with the licensing provisions of
this chapter shall be exempt from the payment of the application fee.

The license year shall be from July 1 to
the following June 30. All applications for renewal of licenses must be
duly made at least thirty days before the commencement of the license year. [L
1967, c 260, §13; HRS §157-22; am L 1977, c 65, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next